src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* Postposition ; is still not included 
* Preposition ;  is still not included 

CONJUNCTIONS 
INTERJ_ 

CS_ Subjunction 

CS-TEMP_ 
**when** 

NUM_ 
NUM_VAHTT 

NUM_1Y_VYXX 
NUM_1Y_VUCC 
NUM_TOLL 
NUM_1Y_VCC 
NUM_AELDD 
NUM_KUEQLL 
NUM_TAQHTT 
NUM_KAEAEUQC 
* **LEXICON NUM_KUEQHTT** kueʹhtt:kuâ%{ʹØ%}h%{ʹØ%}tt 
NUM_KUEQHTT 
NUM_NELLJ 

NUM_AANAR 

NUM_ATOM 
NUM_JEAQNNN 

* **LEXICON NUM_LO** kuttlo:kuttl 
NUM_LO
* **LEXICON NUM-01_LO** kuttlo:kuttl 
NUM-01_LO 
* **+Der+Der/Ord+A:ååǥǥ A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;** This ordinal derivation 

* **LEXICON NUM_LOAOAI** lååi:l  THIS looks like allegro 
NUM_LOAOAI 

* **LEXICON NUM-01_LOAOAI** lååi:l  THIS looks like allegro 
NUM-01_LOAOAI 

PCLE_ is here since Pcle_sms2x.xml wants it. It does nothing.
PCLE-NEG_  is here since Pcle_sms2x.xml wants it. It adds +Neg.

Postpositions with government tagging possible 
ADP_ 
PO_tag is the lexicon adding the tag +Po
PO-ILL_ 
PO-LOC_ 
PO_ is a dummy lexicon not adding anything
ADP-GOV-LOC_ 
PO-GOV-GEN_ 

Prepositions with government tagging possible 

PR_tag is the lexicon adding the tag +Pr 
PR_ is a dummy lexicon not adding anything

PR-TEMP-GOV-LOC_ 

PREFIX/A_ 

SUF/A_ 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
